Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.140

Attribution and aggregation of family contributions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Contributions by spouses are considered separate contributions.

(2) Contributions by unemancipated children under 18 years of age are considered contributions by their parents and are attributed proportionately to each parent. Fifty percent of the contributions are attributed to each parent or, in the case of a single custodial parent, the total amount is attributed to the parent.

[ 2024 c 164 s 456; 2018 c 304 s 11; 1993 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.450, 42.17.650.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.